Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska79-746
Interdistrict school agreements; authorized.

Any public school district in this state may enter into an agreement with any other public school district in this state to provide and share vocational educational programs, particularly programs involving recent technological developments such as electronics, computer science, and communications. The agreement's terms shall be approved by the school board or board of education of each school district participating in the agreement. The terms of the agreement shall include, but not be limited to, the method of sharing or hiring personnel, purchasing equipment and materials, and course curriculum.

The State Board of Vocational Education shall be apprised of all interdistrict school agreements at the time such agreements are executed.

Laws 1983, LB 207, § 2;

R.S.1943, (1994), § 79-1435.02;

Laws 1996, LB 900, § 420.